Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Legislature finds that:

HB3538 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. It is beneficial to the State of Oklahoma to support patient
access to prescription drugs and pharmacy services at fair prices in
a market that supports optimal patient care;
2. The Federal Trade Commission and the United States House
Committee on Oversight and Government Reform have found evidence of
anticompetitive business tactics that have driven locally operated
pharmacies out of business, limiting patient choices and inflating
drug prices at pharmacies owned by pharmacy benefits managers; and
3. The State of Oklahoma wishes to minimize conflicts of
interest by stopping the pharmacy benefits managers acting as a "fox
guarding the henhouse" by being both a price setter and price taker.
B. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State of
Oklahoma shall improve health care delivery in the pharmacy market
for patients by eliminating certain anticompetitive business tactics
as a basic tenet of this act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.1, as
last amended by Section 5, Chapter 340, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 353.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 353.1. For the purposes of the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act:
1. "Accredited program" means those seminars, classes,
meetings, work projects, and other educational courses approved by
the State Board of Pharmacy for purposes of continuing professional
education;
2. "Act" means the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act;
HB3538 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. "Administer" means the direct application of a drug, whether
by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body
of a patient;
4. "Assistant pharmacist" means any person presently licensed
as an assistant pharmacist in this state by the Board pursuant to
Section 353.10 of this title and for the purposes of the Oklahoma
Pharmacy Act shall be considered the same as a pharmacist, except
where otherwise specified;
5. "Board" or "State Board" means the State Board of Pharmacy;
6. "Certify" or "certification of a prescription" means the
review of a filled prescription by a licensed pharmacist or a
licensed practitioner with dispensing authority to confirm that the
medication, labeling, and packaging of the filled prescription are
accurate and meet all requirements prescribed by state and federal
law. For the purposes of this paragraph, "licensed practitioner"
shall not include optometrists with dispensing authority;
7. "Chemical" means any medicinal substance, whether simple or
compound or obtained through the process of the science and art of
chemistry, whether of organic or inorganic origin;
8. "Compounding" means the combining, admixing, mixing,
diluting, pooling, reconstituting, or otherwise altering of a drug
or bulk drug substance to create a drug. Compounding includes the
preparation of drugs or devices in anticipation of prescription drug
orders based on routine, regularly observed prescribing patterns;
HB3538 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

9. "Continuing professional education" means professional,
pharmaceutical education in the general areas of the socioeconomic
and legal aspects of health care; the properties and actions of
drugs and dosage forms; and the etiology, characteristics, and
therapeutics of the diseased state;
10. "Dangerous drug", "legend drug", "prescription drug", or
"Rx Only" means a drug:
a. for human use subject to 21 U.S.C., Section 353(b)(1),
or
b. is labeled "Prescription Only", or labeled with the
following statement: "Caution: Federal law restricts
this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed
veterinarian.";
11. "Director" means the Executive Director of the State Board
of Pharmacy unless context clearly indicates otherwise;
12. "Dispense" or "dispensing" means the interpretation,
evaluation, and implementation of a prescription drug order
including the preparation and delivery of a drug or device to a
patient or a patient's agent in a suitable container appropriately
labeled for subsequent administration to, or use by, a patient.
Dispense includes sell, distribute, leave with, give away, dispose
of, deliver, or supply;
13. "Dispenser" means a retail pharmacy, hospital pharmacy, a
group of chain pharmacies under common ownership and control that do
HB3538 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

not act as a wholesale distributor, or any other person authorized
by law to dispense or administer prescription drugs, and the
affiliated warehouses or distributions of such entities under common
ownership and control that do not act as a wholesale distributor.
For the purposes of this paragraph, dispenser does not mean a person
who dispenses only products to be used in animals in accordance with
21 U.S.C., Section 360b(a)(5);
14. "Distribute" or "distribution" means the sale, purchase,
trade, delivery, handling, storage, or receipt of a product, and
does not include the dispensing of a product pursuant to a
prescription executed in accordance with 21 U.S.C., Section
353(b)(1) or the dispensing of a product approved under 21 U.S.C.,
Section 360b(b); provided, taking actual physical possession of a
product or title shall not be required;
15. "Doctor of Pharmacy" means a person licensed by the Board
to engage in the practice of pharmacy. The terms "pharmacist",
"D.Ph.", and "Doctor of Pharmacy" shall be interchangeable and shall
have the same meaning wherever they appear in the Oklahoma Statutes
and the rules promulgated by the Board;
16. "Drug outlet" means all manufacturers, repackagers,
outsourcing facilities, wholesale distributors, third-party
logistics providers, pharmacies, and all other facilities which are
engaged in dispensing, delivery, distribution, or storage of
dangerous drugs;
HB3538 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

17. "Drugs" means all medicinal substances and preparations
recognized by the United States Pharmacopeia and National Formulary,
or any revision thereof, and all substances and preparations
intended for external and/or internal use in the cure, diagnosis,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals
and all substances and preparations, other than food, intended to
affect the structure or any function of the body of a human or
animals;
18. "Drug sample" means a unit of a prescription drug packaged
under the authority and responsibility of the manufacturer that is
not intended to be sold and is intended to promote the sale of the
drug;
19. "Durable medical equipment" has the same meaning as
provided by Section 375.2 of this title;
20. "Filled prescription" means a packaged prescription
medication to which a label has been affixed which contains such
information as is required by the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act;
21. "Hospital" means any institution licensed as a hospital by
this state for the care and treatment of patients, or a pharmacy
operated by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs;
22. "Licensed practitioner" means:
a. an allopathic physician,
b. an osteopathic physician,
c. a podiatric physician,
HB3538 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

d. a dentist,
e. a veterinarian,
f. an optometrist, or
g. an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse,
licensed to practice and authorized to prescribe dangerous drugs
within the scope of practice of such practitioner;
23. "Manufacturer" or "virtual manufacturer" means with respect
to a product:
a. a person that holds an application approved under 21
U.S.C., Section 355 or a license issued under 42
U.S.C., Section 262 for such product, or if such
product is not the subject of an approved application
or license, the person who manufactured the product,
b. a co-licensed partner of the person described in
subparagraph a of this paragraph that obtains the
product directly from a person described in this
subparagraph or subparagraph a of this paragraph,
c. an affiliate of a person described in subparagraph a
or b of this paragraph who receives the product
directly from a person described in this subparagraph
or in subparagraph a or b of this paragraph, or
d. a person who contracts with another to manufacture a
product;

HB3538 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

24. "Manufacturing" means the production, preparation,
propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a device or a
drug, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
natural origin or independently by means of chemical or biological
synthesis and includes any packaging or repackaging of the
substances or labeling or relabeling of its container, and the
promotion and marketing of such drugs or devices. The term
manufacturing also includes the preparation and promotion of
commercially available products from bulk compounds for resale by
licensed pharmacies, licensed practitioners, or other persons;
25. "Medical gas" means those gases including those in liquid
state upon which the manufacturer or distributor has placed one of
several cautions, such as "Rx Only", in compliance with federal law;
26. "Medical gas order" means an order for medical gas issued
by a licensed prescriber;
27. "Medical gas distributor" means a person licensed to
distribute, transfer, wholesale, deliver, or sell medical gases on
drug orders to suppliers or other entities licensed to use,
administer, or distribute medical gas and may also include a patient
or ultimate user;
28. "Medical gas supplier" means a person who dispenses medical
gases on drug orders only to a patient or ultimate user;


HB3538 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

29. "Medicine" means any drug or combination of drugs which has
the property of curing, preventing, treating, diagnosing, or
mitigating diseases, or which is used for that purpose;
30. "Nonprescription drugs" means medicines or drugs which are
sold without a prescription and which are prepackaged for use by the
consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements of the
statutes and regulations of this state and the federal government.
Such items shall also include medical and dental supplies and
bottled or nonbulk chemicals which are sold or offered for sale to
the general public if such articles or preparations meet the
requirements of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21
U.S.C.A., Section 321 et seq.;
31. "Outsourcing facility" including "virtual outsourcing
facility" means a facility at one geographic location or address
that:
a. is engaged in the compounding of sterile drugs,
b. has elected to register as an outsourcing facility,
and
c. complies with all requirements of 21 U.S.C., Section
353b;
32. "Package" means the smallest individual saleable unit of
product for distribution by a manufacturer or repackager that is
intended by the manufacturer for ultimate sale to the dispenser of
such product. For the purposes of this paragraph, "individual
HB3538 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

sale able unit" means the smallest container of a product introduced
into commerce by the manufacturer or repackager that is intended by
the manufacturer or repackager for individual sale to a dispenser;
33. "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, or association, unless the context
otherwise requires;
34. "Pharmacist-in-charge" or "PIC" means the pharmacist
licensed in this state responsible for the management control of a
pharmacy and all other aspects of the practice of pharmacy in a
licensed pharmacy as provided by Section 353.18 of this title;
35. "Pharmacy" means a place regularly licensed by the State
Board of Pharmacy in which prescriptions, drugs, medicines,
chemicals, and poisons are compounded or dispensed or such place
where pharmacists practice the profession of pharmacy, or a pharmacy
operated by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs;
36. "Pharmacy benefits manager" means a person, business, or
entity, including a wholly or partially owned or controlled
subsidiary of a pharmacy benefits manager, that provides claims
processing services or other prescription drug or device services,
or both, for health benefit plans. Pharmacy benefits manager does
not include any:
a. health care facility licensed in Oklahoma,
b. health care professional licensed in Oklahoma,

HB3538 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

c. consultant who only provides advice as to the
selection or performance of a pharmacy benefits
manager, or
d. entity that provides claims processing services or
other prescription drug or device services for the
fee-for-service Oklahoma Medicaid program only in that
capacity;
37. "Pharmacy employer" means an employer that sponsors a
health benefit plan for its employees and their dependents, and
owns, operates, or controls a pharmacy that provides pharmacy
services exclusively to those employees and dependents;
38. "Pharmacy technician", "technician", "Rx tech", or "tech"
means a person issued a technician permit by the State Board of
Pharmacy to assist the pharmacist and perform nonjudgmental,
technical, manipulative, non-discretionary functions in the
prescription department under the immediate and direct supervision
of a pharmacist;
37. 39. "Poison" means any substance which when introduced into
the body, either directly or by absorption, produces violent,
morbid, or fatal changes, or which destroys living tissue with which
such substance comes into contact;
38. 40. "Practice of pharmacy" means:
a. the interpretation and evaluation of prescription
orders,
HB3538 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. the compounding, dispensing, administering, and
labeling of drugs and devices, except labeling by a
manufacturer, repackager, or distributor of
nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged legend
drugs and devices,
c. the participation in drug selection and drug
utilization reviews,
d. the proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and
the maintenance of proper records thereof,
e. the responsibility for advising by counseling and
providing information, where professionally necessary
or where regulated, of therapeutic values, content,
hazards, and use of drugs and devices,
f. the offering or performing of those acts, services,
operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct,
operation, management, and control of a pharmacy, or
g. the provision of those acts or services that are
necessary to provide pharmaceutical care;
39. 41. "Preparation" means an article which may or may not
contain sterile products compounded in a licensed pharmacy pursuant
to the order of a licensed prescriber;
40. 42. "Prescriber" means a person licensed in this state who
is authorized to prescribe dangerous drugs within the scope of
practice of the person's profession;
HB3538 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

41. 43. "Prescription" means and includes any order for drug or
medical supplies written or signed, or transmitted by word of mouth,
telephone, or other means of communication:
a. by a licensed prescriber,
b. by a physician assistant pursuant to a practice
agreement,
c. (1) under the supervision of a supervising physician,
by a Certified Nurse Practitioner, Clinical Nurse
Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife licensed
in this state who has not obtained independent
prescriptive authority under Section 1 567.4c of
this act title, or
(2) by a Certified Nurse Practitioner, Clinical Nurse
Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife licensed
in this state who has obtained independent
prescriptive authority under Section 1 567.4c of
act title, or
d. by an Oklahoma licensed wholesaler or distributor as
authorized in Section 353.29.1 of this title;
42. 44. "Product" means a prescription drug in a finished
dosage form for administration to a patient without substantial
further manufacturing, such as capsules, tablets, and lyophilized
products before reconstitution. Product does not include blood

HB3538 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

comp onents intended for transfusion, radioactive drugs or biologics
and medical gas;
43. 45. "Repackager", including "virtual repackager", means a
person who owns or operates an establishment that repacks and
relabels a product or package for further sale or distribution
without further transaction;
44. 46. "Sterile drug" means a drug that is intended for
parenteral administration, an ophthalmic or oral inhalation drug in
aqueous format, or a drug that is required to be sterile under state
and federal law;
45. 47. "Supervising physician" means an individual holding a
current license to practice as a physician from the State Board of
Medical Licensure and Supervision, pursuant to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical Licensure and Supervision
Act, or the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act, who supervises
a Certified Nurse Practitioner, Clinical Nurse Specialist, or
Certified Nurse-Midwife as defined in Section 567.3a of this title
who has not obtained independent prescriptive authority under
Section 1 567.4c of this act title, and who is not in training as an
intern, resident, or fellow. The supervising physician shall remain
in compliance with the rules promulgated by the State Board of
Medical Licensure and Supervision or the State Board of Osteopathic
Examiners;
HB3538 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

46. 48. "Supportive personnel" means technicians and auxiliary
supportive persons who are regularly paid employees of a pharmacy
who work and perform tasks in the pharmacy as authorized by Section
353.18A of this title;
47. 49. "Third-party logistics provider" including "virtual
third-party logistics provider" means an entity that provides or
coordinates warehousing, or other logistics services of a product in
interstate commerce on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale
distributor, or dispenser of a product but does not take ownership
of the product, nor have responsibility to direct the sale or
disposition of the product. For the purposes of this paragraph,
third-party logistics provider does not include shippers and the
United States Postal Service;
48. 50. "Wholesale distributor" including "virtual wholesale
distributor" means a person other than a manufacturer, a
manufacturer's co-licensed partner, a third-party logistics
provider, or repackager engaged in wholesale distribution as defined
by 21 U.S.C., Section 353(e)(4) as amended by the Drug Supply Chain
Security Act;
49. 51. "County jail" means a facility operated by a county for
the physical detention and correction of persons charged with, or
convicted of, criminal offenses or ordinance violations or persons
found guilty of civil or criminal contempt;

HB3538 HFLR Page 15
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

50. 52. "State correctional facility" means a facility or
institution that houses a prisoner population under the jurisdiction
of the Department of Corrections;
51. 53. "Unit dose package" means a package that contains a
single dose drug with the name, strength, control number, and
expiration date of that drug on the label; and
52. 54. "Unit of issue package" means a package that provides
multiple doses of the same drug, but each drug is individually
separated and includes the name, lot number, and expiration date.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 360.10 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "License" means a license issued under Section 358 of this
title;
2. "Permit" includes a pharmacy permit for a mail-order
pharmacy;
3. "Pharmacy benefits manager" means the same as defined in
Section 353.1 of this title; and
4. "Pharmacy benefits manager" includes an entity that:
a. is managed by a pharmacy benefits manager or is a
subsidiary of a pharmacy benefits manager, or
b. has a direct or indirect ownership interest in a
pharmacy benefits manager.
HB3538 HFLR Page 16
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. A pharmacy benefits manager shall not acquire direct or
indirect interest in, or otherwise hold, directly or indirectly, a
license under Section 358 of this title for the retail sale of drugs
or medicines in this state.
C. On and after the effective date of this act, the Oklahoma
State Board of Pharmacy shall either revoke or not renew a license
of an entity that violates this section.
D. The Board may issue a limited use license for certain rare,
orphan, or limited distribution drugs that are otherwise unavailable
in the market to a patient or a pharmacy that would otherwise be
prohibited under this section.
E. The Board may assess the need for rare, orphan, or limited
distribution drugs for a limited use license for certain rare,
orphan, or limited distribution drugs under subsection D of this
section before revocation or renewal of an existing retail license
for a pharmacy.
F. If the assessment made by the Board in subsection E of this
section determines that a rare, orphan, or limited distribution drug
is otherwise unavailable in the market to a patient or pharmacy that
would otherwise be prohibited in this section, the Board shall
convert the retail license for the prohibited pharmacy to a limited
use license for that pharmacy for a period of no less than ninety
(90) days.

HB3538 HFLR Page 17
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

G. Before the effective date of this act, the Board shall adopt
a written policy to implement subsection D of this section. The
written policy shall establish:
1. The process in which a patient, pharmacy, or health care
provider may notify the Board of a rare, orphan, or limited
distribution drug unavailable in the market;
2. The process in which a pharmacy may request a limited use
license under subsection D of this section;
3. The timeline in which the Board must make a decision; and
4. The process for emergency determinations due to patient
need.
H. The Board may extend the use of a retail license or issue a
renewal of a retail license for a pharmacy that offers same-day
patient access for pharmacist services, a prescription for a
controlled substance, mental health services, or other critical
patient health care services for a period of time as determined by
the Board if there is a pending sale of the pharmacy to an eligible
buyer.
I. This section does not apply to a pharmacy employer and a
pharmacy that:
1. Has direct or indirect interest in a pharmacy benefits
manager;


HB3538 HFLR Page 18
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Are the sole Oklahoma client of the pharmacy benefits
manager that the pharmacy employer has a direct or indirect interest
in; and
3. Exclusively services the employees and dependents of the
pharmacy employer while utilizing the affiliated pharmacy benefits
manager in this state.
J. Subsections D through I of this section shall expire on
September 1, 2028.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 360.11 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma State Board of Pharmacy shall conduct an
initial assessment of each active retail pharmacy license that was
issued under Section 353.18 of this title as of July 1, 2026, and
shall send written notice to each pharmacy license holder that the
Board reasonably believes will violate Section 353.18 of this title
at least ninety (90) days before January 1, 2027.
B. As used in subsection A of this section, "written notice"
means actual notice to the pharmacy license holder via mail or
email.
C. The written notice required under subsection A of this
section shall include:
1. A list of each pharmacy benefits manager that holds a direct
or indirect interest in, or otherwise holds, directly or indirectly,
HB3538 HFLR Page 19
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

a li cense under Section 353.18 of this title for the retail sale of
drugs or medicines in this state held by the pharmacy license
holder;
2. A phone number and email address that is monitored by the
Board during regular business hours; and
3. A list of Oklahoma pharmacies that hold an active retail
pharmacy license that are not reasonably expected to be in violation
of this act as of January 1, 2027. The list shall include:
a. the name of the pharmacy,
b. the phone number of the pharmacy,
c. the physical address of the pharmacy,
d. the website of the pharmacy, if known, and
e. an email address for the pharmacy, if known.
D. If the Board has a searchable website that includes the
information required in paragraph 3 of subsection C of this section,
the Board may provide the website information in lieu of the list.
E. A pharmacy license holder with written notice from the Board
in subsection A of this section shall provide written notice at
least sixty (60) days before January 1, 2028, to each patient and
each patient's prescribing health care provider that has used the
pharmacy within the previous twelve (12) months that the pharmacy
can no longer dispense retail drugs to the patient on or after
December 31, 2027.

HB3538 HFLR Page 20
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

F. As used in subsection E of this section, "written notice"
means actual notice to the patient via mail, email, or through the
pharmacy's patient portal.
G. The written notice required in subsection E of this section
shall include the information under paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection
C of this section provided by the Board to the pharmacy license
holder.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended.











HB3538 HFLR Page 21
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.